Utah statutes.
20A-16-402.   Timeliness and scope of application for military-overseas ballot.

(1)  An application for a military-overseas ballot is timely if received by the Friday immediately before the election.

(2)  An application for a military-overseas ballot for a regular primary election or municipal primary election, whether or not timely, is effective as an application for a military-overseas ballot for the regular general election or municipal general election.

